Utah statutes.
76-10-801.   "Nuisance" defined -- Violation -- Classification of offense.
(1) A nuisance is any item, thing, manner, condition whatsoever that is
dangerous to human life or health or renders soil, air, water, or food impure
or unwholesome.
(2)  Any person, whether as owner, agent, or occupant who creates, aids in
creating, or contributes to a nuisance, or who supports, continues, or retains
a nuisance, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
